Alaska statutes. Title 11. Criminal Law.
Article 6. Abuse of Public Office.

Collateral references. —

63C Am. Jur. 2d, Public Officers and Employees, §§ 357-373, 396-401.

67 C.J.S., Officers and Public Employees, §§ 119-121, 247-253.

Infamous crime or one involving moral turpitude constituting disqualification to hold public office, 52 ALR2d 1314.

Official oppression, what constitutes offense of, 83 ALR2d 1007.

Personal liability of policeman, sheriff, or similar peace officer or his bond, for injury suffered as a result of failure to enforce law or arrest law breaker, 41 ALR3d 700.

Removal of public officer for misconduct during previous term, 42 ALR3d 691.

Validity and construction of statute authorizing grand jury to submit report concerning public servant’s noncriminal misconduct, 63 ALR3d 586.

Sexual misconduct or irregularity as amounting to “conduct unbecoming an officer,” justifying officer’s demotion or removal or suspension from duty, 9 ALR4th 614.

Sec. 11.56.850.
Official misconduct.

A public servant commits the crime of official misconduct if, with intent to obtain a benefit or to injure or deprive another person of a benefit, the public servant

performs an act relating to the public servant’s office but constituting an unauthorized exercise of the public servant’s official functions, knowing that that act is unauthorized; or

knowingly refrains from performing a duty which is imposed upon the public servant by law or is clearly inherent in the nature of the public servant’s office.

Official misconduct is a class A misdemeanor.

History.

(§ 6 ch 166 SLA 1978)

Cross references. —

Definition of “public servant,” “benefit” — AS

11.81.900(b)

Bribery — AS

11.56.100

Receiving a bribe — AS

11.56.110

Misuse of confidential information — AS

11.56.860

Original Code Provision — AS 11.30.230.

TD: V, 74-75.

For punishment of class A misdemeanors, see AS

12.55.135(a)

for imprisonment and AS

12.55.035

for fines.

For conduct prohibited by the Legislative Ethics Act, see AS

24.60.030

.

For provisions of the Alaska Executive Branch Ethics Act relating to misuse of official position, see AS

39.52.120

.

Sec. 11.56.860.
Misuse of confidential information.

A person who is or has been a public servant commits the crime of misuse of confidential information if the person

learns confidential information through employment as a public servant; and

while in office or after leaving office, uses the confidential information for personal gain or in a manner not connected with the performance of official duties other than by giving sworn testimony or evidence in a legal proceeding in conformity with a court order.

As used in this section, “confidential information” means information which has been classified confidential by law.

Misuse of confidential information is a class A misdemeanor.

History.

(§ 6 ch 166 SLA 1978)

Cross references. —

Definition of “public servant” — AS

11.81.900(b)

Official misconduct — AS

11.56.850

Original Code Provision — AS

39.51.010

.

TD: V, 75-77.

For punishment of class A misdemeanors, see AS

12.55.135(a)

for imprisonment and AS

12.55.035

for fines.

Sec. 11.56.870.
Renumbered as AS 11.56.845.